Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "hospital" means a facility licensed pursuant to KRS
Chapter 216B as either an acute care hospital, psychiatric hospital, rehabilitation
hospital, or chemical dependency treatment facility.
(2) Any person who unlawfully traffics in a controlled substance classified in
Schedule I, II, III, IV, or V, or a controlled substance analogue, in any hospital
building, on hospital grounds, or on any premises owned or controlled by a
hospital shall be guilty of a Class D felony, unless a more severe penalty is set
forth in this chapter, in which case the higher penalty shall apply.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to any
misdemeanor offense relating to salvia.
(4) Each hospital shall display in prominent locations, which may include parking
lots, lobbies, waiting rooms, and cafeterias, a sign at least six (6) inches high and
fourteen (14) inches wide stating:
UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OR TRAFFICKING OF A
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ON HOSPITAL
PROPERTY IN KENTUCKY IS A FELONY PUNISHABLE
BY A MAXIMUM OF FIVE (5) YEARS IN PRISON AND A
TEN THOUSAND DOLLAR ($10,000) FINE.
Failure to post the sign shall not relieve any person of liability under this section.
Section 2. KRS 218A.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possession of a controlled substance in the first degree when
he or she knowingly and unlawfully possesses:
(a) A controlled substance that is classified in Schedules I or II and is a narcotic
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 868
drug;
(b) A controlled substance analogue;
(c) Methamphetamine;
(d) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(e) Phencyclidine;
(f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), including its salts, isomers, salts of
isomers, and analogues; or
(g) Flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, possession of a controlled
substance in the first degree is a Class D felony subject to the following provisions:
(a) The maximum term of incarceration shall be no greater than three (3) years,
notwithstanding KRS Chapter 532;
(b) For a person's first or second offense under this section, he or she may be
subject to a period of:
1. Deferred prosecution pursuant to KRS 218A.14151; or
2. Presumptive probation;
(c) Deferred prosecution under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be the
preferred alternative for a first offense; and
(d) If a person does not enter a deferred prosecution program for his or her first or
second offense, he or she shall be subject to a period of presumptive
probation, unless a court determines the defendant is not eligible for
presumptive probation as defined in KRS 218A.010.
(3) (a) Possession of a controlled substance in any hospital building, on hospital
grounds, or on any premises owned or controlled by a hospital is a Class D
felony, unless a more severe penalty is set forth in this chapter, in which
case the higher penalty shall apply.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hospital" means a facility licensed pursuant to
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 868
KRS Chapter 216B as either an acute care hospital, psychiatric hospital,
rehabilitation hospital, or chemical dependency treatment facility.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2025 9:40 AM Jacketed